Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 861.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Advertise” means the publication or dissemination of an advertisement.

“Advertisement” means any written or verbal statement, illustration, or depiction that is calculated to induce sales of cannabis or cannabis products, including any written, printed, graphic, or other material; billboard, sign, or other outdoor display; other periodical literature, publication, or in a radio or television broadcast; the Internet; or in any other media. The term does not include:

any label affixed to any cannabis or cannabis product or any individual covering, carton, or other wrapper of that container that constitutes a part of the labeling under provisions of these standards;

any editorial or other reading material, such as a news release, in any periodical or publication or newspaper for the publication of which no money or valuable consideration is paid or promised, directly or indirectly, by any cannabis establishment, and that is not written by or at the direction of the licensee;

any educational, instructional, or otherwise noncommercial material that is not intended to induce sales and that does not propose an economic transaction, but that merely provides information to the public in an unbiased manner; or

a sign attached to the premises of a cannabis establishment that merely identifies the location of the cannabis establishment.

“Affiliate” means a person that directly or indirectly owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with another person.

“Applicant” means a person that applies for a license to operate a cannabis establishment pursuant to this chapter.

“Board” means the Cannabis Control Board.

“Cannabis” has the same meaning as in section 831 of this title.

“Cannabis cultivator” or “cultivator” means a person licensed by the Board to engage in the cultivation of cannabis in accordance with this chapter.

“Cannabis establishment” means a cannabis cultivator, wholesaler, product manufacturer, retailer, testing laboratory, or integrated licensee licensed by the Board to engage in commercial cannabis activity in accordance with this chapter.

“Cannabis product” has the same meaning as in section 831 of this title.

“Cannabis product manufacturer” or “product manufacturer” means a person licensed by the Board to manufacture cannabis products in accordance with this chapter.

“Cannabis retailer” or “retailer” means a person licensed by the Board to sell cannabis and cannabis products to adults 21 years of age and older for off-site consumption or cultivation in accordance with this chapter.

“Cannabis testing laboratory” or “testing laboratory” means a person licensed by the Board to test cannabis and cannabis products in accordance with this chapter.

“Cannabis wholesaler” or “wholesaler” means a person licensed by the Board to purchase, process, transport, and sell cannabis and cannabis products in accordance with this chapter.

“Chair” means the Chair of the Cannabis Control Board.

“Characterizing flavor” means a taste or aroma, other than the taste or aroma of cannabis, imparted either prior to or during consumption of a cannabis product. The term includes tastes or aromas relating to any fruit, chocolate, vanilla, honey, maple, candy, cocoa, dessert, alcoholic beverage, mint, menthol, wintergreen, herb or spice, or other food or drink or to any conceptual flavor that imparts a taste or aroma that is distinguishable from cannabis flavor but may not relate to any particular known flavor.

“Child-resistant packaging” means packaging that is designed or constructed to be significantly difficult for children under five years of age to open or obtain a toxic or harmful amount of the substance in the container within a reasonable time and not difficult for normal adults to use properly, but does not mean packaging that all children under five years of age cannot open or obtain a toxic or harmful amount of the substance in the container within a reasonable time.

“Controls,” “is controlled by,” and “under common control” mean the power to direct, or cause the direction or management and policies of a person, whether through the direct or beneficial ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise. A person who directly or beneficially owns 10 percent or more equity interest, or the equivalent thereof, of another person shall be deemed to control the person.

“Dispensary” means a business organization licensed pursuant to chapter 37 of this title or 18 V.S.A. chapter 86.

“Enclosed, locked facility” means a building, room, greenhouse, outdoor fenced-in area, or other location that is enclosed on all sides and prevents cannabis from easily being viewed by the public. The facility shall be equipped with locks or other security devices that permit access only by:

Employees, agents, or owners of the cultivator, all of whom shall be 21 years of age or older.

Government employees performing their official duties.

Contractors performing labor that does not include cannabis cultivation, packaging, or processing. Contractors shall be accompanied by an employee, agent, or owner of the cultivator when they are in areas where cannabis is being grown, processed, packaged, or stored.

Registered employees of other cultivators, members of the media, elected officials, and other individuals 21 years of age or older visiting the facility, provided they are accompanied by an employee, agent, or owner of the cultivator.

“Flavored oil cannabis product” means any oil cannabis product that contains an additive to give it a characterizing flavor.

“Integrated licensee” means a person licensed by the Board to engage in the activities of a cultivator, wholesaler, product manufacturer, retailer, and testing laboratory in accordance with this chapter.

“Municipality” means a town, city, or incorporated village.

“Person” shall include any natural person; corporation; municipality; the State of Vermont or any department, agency, or subdivision of the State; and any partnership, unincorporated association, or other legal entity.

“Plant canopy” means the square footage dedicated to live plant production and does not include areas such as office space or areas used for the storage of fertilizers, pesticides, or other products.

“Principal” means an individual vested with the authority to conduct, manage, or supervise the business affairs of a person, and may include the president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, manager, or similar executive officer of a business; a director of a corporation, nonprofit corporation, or mutual benefit enterprise; a member of a nonprofit corporation, cooperative, or member-managed limited liability company; and a partner of a partnership.

“Small cultivator” means a cultivator with a plant canopy or space for cultivating plants for breeding stock of not more than 1,000 square feet.

“Clone” means a plant section from a female cannabis plant not yet root-bound, growing in a water solution, which is capable of developing into a new plant.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020; amended

2021, No. 62

, § 5, eff. June 7, 2021;

2021, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, effective March 25, 2022.

§ 862.
Not applicable to hemp or therapeutic use of cannabis.

This chapter applies to the regulation of cannabis establishments by the Board and shall not apply to activities regulated by 6 V.S.A. chapter 34 (hemp), 18 V.S.A. chapter 86 (therapeutic use of cannabis), or chapters 35 (Medical Cannabis Registry) and 37 (cannabis medical dispensaries) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 863.
Regulation by local government.

Prior to a cannabis retailer or the retail portion of an integrated licensee operating within a municipality, the municipality shall affirmatively permit the operation of such cannabis establishments by majority vote of those present and voting by Australian ballot at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose. A municipality may place retailers or integrated licensees, or both, on the ballot for approval.
(a) (1) Prior to a cannabis retailer or the retail portion of an integrated licensee operating within a municipality, the municipality shall affirmatively permit the operation of such cannabis establishments by majority vote of those present and voting by Australian ballot at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose. A municipality may place retailers or integrated licensees, or both, on the ballot for approval.

A vote to permit the operation of a licensed cannabis retailer or integrated licensee within the municipality shall remain in effect until rescinded by majority vote of those present and voting by Australian ballot at a subsequent annual or special meeting warned for that purpose. A rescission of the permission to operate a licensed cannabis retailer or integrated licensee within the municipality under this subdivision shall not apply to a licensed cannabis retailer or integrated licensee that is operating within the municipality at the time of the vote.

A municipality that hosts any cannabis establishment may establish a cannabis control commission composed of commissioners who may be members of the municipal legislative body. The local cannabis control commission may issue and administer local control licenses under this subsection for cannabis establishments within the municipality but shall not assess a fee for a local control license issued to a cannabis establishment. The commissioners may condition the issuance of a local control license upon compliance with any bylaw adopted pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 4414

or ordinances regulating signs or public nuisances adopted pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 2291

. The commission may suspend or revoke a local control license for a violation of any condition placed upon the license. The Board shall adopt rules relating to a municipality’s issuance of a local control license in accordance with this subsection and the local commissioners shall administer the rules furnished to them by the Board as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

Prior to issuing a license to a cannabis establishment under this chapter, the Board shall ensure that the applicant has obtained a local control license from the municipality, if required.

A municipality shall not:

prohibit the operation of a cannabis establishment within the municipality through an ordinance adopted pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 2291

or a bylaw adopted pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 4414

;

condition the operation of a cannabis establishment, or the issuance or renewal of a municipal permit to operate a cannabis establishment, on any basis other than the conditions in subsection (b) of this section; and

exceed the authority granted to it by law to regulate a cannabis establishment.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020; amended

2021, No. 62

, § 1, eff. June 7, 2021;

2021, No. 86

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, effective March 25, 2022.

§ 864.
Advertising.

“Advertise” and “advertisement” have the same meaning as in section 861 of this title.

A cannabis establishment advertisement shall not contain any statement or illustration that:

is deceptive, false, or misleading;

promotes overconsumption;

represents that the use of cannabis has curative effects;

offers a prize, award, or inducement for purchasing cannabis or a cannabis product, except that price discounts are allowed;

offers free samples of cannabis or cannabis products;

depicts a person under 21 years of age consuming cannabis or cannabis products; or

is designed to be or has the effect of being particularly appealing to persons under 21 years of age.

Cannabis establishments shall not advertise their products via any medium unless the licensee can show that not more than 15 percent of the audience is reasonably expected to be under 21 years of age.

All advertisements shall contain health warnings adopted by rule by the Board in consultation with the Department of Health.

All advertisements shall be submitted to the Board on a form or in a format prescribed by the Board, prior to the dissemination of the advertisement. The Board may:

require a specific disclosure be made in the advertisement in a clear and conspicuous manner if the Board determines that the advertisement would be false or misleading without such a disclosure; or

require changes that are necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare or consistent with dispensing information for the product under review.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 62

, § 6, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 865.
Education.

A licensee shall complete an enforcement seminar every three years conducted by the Board. A license shall not be renewed unless the records of the Board show that the licensee has complied with the terms of this subsection.

A licensee shall ensure that each employee involved in the sale of cannabis or cannabis products to the public completes a training program approved by the Board prior to selling cannabis or cannabis products and at least once every 24 months thereafter. The training shall include information about the health effects of the use of cannabis and cannabis products. A licensee shall keep a written record of the type and date of training for each employee, which shall be signed by each employee. A licensee may comply with this requirement by conducting its own training program on its premises, using information and materials furnished by the Board. A licensee who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be subject to a suspension of not less than one day of the license issued under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 866.
Youth.

A cannabis establishment licensed pursuant to this chapter shall not dispense or sell cannabis to a person under 21 years of age or employ a person under 21 years of age. The Board may assess civil penalties against or suspend or revoke the license of a cannabis establishment that dispenses or sells cannabis or cannabis products to a person under 21 years of age.

A cannabis establishment shall not permit a person under 21 years of age to enter a building or enclosure on the premises where cannabis is located. This subsection shall not apply to a registered patient visiting a dispensary even if that dispensary is located in a building that is located on the same premises of a cannabis establishment.

The Board, in consultation with the Department of Health, shall adopt rules in accordance with section 881 of this title to:

prohibit cannabis products or the packaging of such products that are designed to make the product more appealing to persons under 21 years of age;

prohibit the packaging of cannabis and cannabis products that is designed to make the product more appealing to persons under 21 years of age;

require that cannabis products sold by licensed retailers and integrated licensees are contained in child-resistant packaging; and

require that cannabis and cannabis products sold by licensed retailers and integrated licensees are packaged with labels that clearly indicate that the contents of the package contain cannabis and should be kept away from persons under 21 years of age.

In accordance with section 864 of this title, advertising by a cannabis establishment shall not depict a person under 21 years of age consuming cannabis or cannabis products or be designed to be or have the effect of being particularly appealing to persons under 21 years of age. Cannabis establishments shall not advertise their products via any medium unless the licensee can show that not more than 15 percent of the audience is reasonably expected to be under 21 years of age.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020; amended

2021, No. 62

, § 7, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 867.
Standard symbol for cannabis.

The Board shall create a standard symbol that shall be used on all cannabis and cannabis products sold by a licensed cannabis retailer to indicate that the contents of a package contain cannabis.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 868.
Prohibited products.

The following are prohibited products and may not be cultivated, produced or sold pursuant to a license issued under this chapter:

cannabis flower with greater than 30 percent tetrahydrocannabinol;

solid concentrate cannabis products with greater than 60 percent tetrahydrocannabinol;

oil cannabis products except for those that are sold prepackaged for use with battery-powered devices;

flavored oil cannabis products sold prepackaged for use with battery-powered devices and any cannabis flower that contains characterizing flavor that is not naturally occurring in the cannabis;

cannabis products that contain delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and nicotine or alcoholic beverages; and

any cannabis, cannabis products, or packaging of such items that are designed to make the product more appealing to persons under 21 years of age.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 869.
Cultivation of cannabis; environmental and land use standards.

A cannabis establishment shall not be regulated as “farming” under the Required Agricultural Practices, 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, or other State law, and cannabis produced from cultivation shall not be considered an agricultural product or agricultural crop for the purposes of 32 V.S.A. chapter 124,

32 V.S.A. § 9741

, or other relevant State law.
(a) (1) A cannabis establishment shall not be regulated as “farming” under the Required Agricultural Practices, 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, or other State law, and cannabis produced from cultivation shall not be considered an agricultural product or agricultural crop for the purposes of 32 V.S.A. chapter 124,

32 V.S.A. § 9741

, or other relevant State law.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the cultivation of cannabis on agricultural land and the use of farm buildings to dry or process that cannabis shall not disqualify the land or buildings from the use value appraisal program or constitute “development” under

32 V.S.A. § 3752(5)

, provided that:

the agricultural land or farm building is enrolled in the use value appraisal program at the time cannabis cultivation commences;

the agricultural land or farm building is not transferred to another owner;

the cultivation, drying, or processing of cannabis is done by a licensed small cultivator on 1,000 square feet or less of agricultural land; and

all other requirements under 32 V.S.A. chapter 124 continue to be met.

The cultivation, processing, and manufacturing of cannabis regulated under this chapter shall comply with all applicable State, federal, and local environmental, energy, or public health law, unless otherwise provided under this chapter.

A cannabis establishment regulated under this chapter shall be subject to regulation under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117 as authorized by this chapter.

The cultivation, processing, and manufacturing of cannabis regulated under this chapter shall comply with the following sections of the Required Agricultural Practices:
(d) (1) The cultivation, processing, and manufacturing of cannabis regulated under this chapter shall comply with the following sections of the Required Agricultural Practices:

section 6, regarding conditions, restriction, and operating standards;

section 8, regarding groundwater quality and groundwater quality investigations; and

section 12, regarding subsurface tile drainage.

Application of or compliance with the Required Agricultural Practices under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be construed to provide a presumption of compliance with or exemption to any applicable State, federal, and local environmental, energy, public health, or land use law required under subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

Persons cultivating cannabis or handling pesticides for the purposes of the manufacture of cannabis products shall comply with the worker protection standard of 40 C.F.R. part 170.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.